Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-502, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 375, O.S.L. 2025 (10A O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1-4-502), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-502. A. A parent entitled to service of summons,


the state or a child shall have the right to demand a trial by jury


on the sole issue of termination of parental rights only in the


following circumstances:


1. When the initial petition to determine if a child is


deprived also contains a request for termination of parental rights


in which case the court shall determine if the child should be



Req. No. 3389 Page 1


adjudicated deprived and, if so, the jury shall determine if


parental rights should be terminated; or


2. When, following a hearing in which the child is adjudicated


deprived, a request for termination of parental rights is filed by


the state or the child.


B. The demand for a jury trial shall be granted unless waived,


or the court on its own motion may call a jury to try any


termination of parental rights case.


C. 1. If the jury trial to determine whether parental rights


should be terminated is waived, the court shall issue a scheduling


order within thirty (30) days. A bench trial shall commence within


ninety (90) days of the issuance of the scheduling order unless the


court issues a written order with findings of fact supporting a


determination that there exists an exceptional circumstance to


support the delay or that the parties and the guardian ad litem, if


any, agree to such continuance. A bench trial under this paragraph


shall be conducted by a separate court than a court that conducted


any hearing pursuant to subsection A of Section 1-4-503 of this


title. Any judge who presides over a hearing where the rules of


evidence do not apply shall not preside over a subsequent trial


where the rules of evidence do apply.


2. Upon a demand for a trial by jury, the court shall issue a


scheduling order within thirty (30) days. A jury trial shall


commence within six (6) months of the issuance of the scheduling

Req. No. 3389 Page 2


order unless the court issues a written order with findings of fact


supporting a determination that there exists an exceptional


circumstance to support the delay or that the parties and the


guardian ad litem, if any, agree to such continuance. The jury


shall consist of six (6) persons. A party who requests a jury trial


and fails to appear in person for such trial, after proper notice


and without good cause, may be deemed by the court to have waived


the right to such jury trial, and the termination of parental rights


shall be by nonjury trial unless another party demands a jury trial


or the court determines on its own motion to try the case to a jury.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3389 TEK 1/14/2026 10:22:38 PM























Req. No. 3389 Page 3